Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.250

Podiatric physician health program—License surcharge.

(1) To implement a podiatric physician health program as authorized by RCW 18.130.175, the board shall enter into a contract with a physician health program or a voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program. The podiatric physician health program may include any or all of the following:

(a) Contracting with providers of treatment programs;

(b) Receiving and evaluating reports of suspected impairment from any source;

(c) Intervening in cases of verified impairment;

(d) Referring impaired podiatric physicians to treatment programs;

(e) Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of impaired podiatric physicians including those ordered by the board;

(f) Providing education, prevention of impairment, posttreatment monitoring, and support of rehabilitated impaired podiatric physicians; and

(g) Performing other related activities as determined by the board.

(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section shall be financed by a surcharge of $70 per year or equivalent on each license issuance or renewal to be collected by the department from every podiatric physician licensed under this chapter. These moneys must be placed in the health professions account to be used solely for implementation of the podiatric physician health program.

[ 2024 c 15 s 5; 2022 c 43 s 1; 2017 c 22 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—2024 c 15: See note following RCW 18.71.310.